src/fst/affixes/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON ADV_ !!= * @CODE@ adverbs
+Comp:%>рак K  ;
+Weak:%>ла K  ;
: K ;

!LEXICON ADV2_  ! Adverbs that take PX
!+PxSg1:%>Е2м   K ;
!+PxSg2:%>Е2т K ;

!+PxSg3:%>ыж K ; !NB_PX_CX Only after ш see twolc
!+PxSg3:%>ыжЫ2 K ; !NB_PX_CX Only after ш see twolc
!+PxSg3:%>жЫ2 K ; !NB_PX_CX
!+PxSg3:%>ж K ; !NB_PX_CX

!+PxPl1:%>на K ;
!+PxPl2:%>да K ;
!+PxPl3:%>Ы1шт K ;
!+Comp:%>рак K  ;
!+Weak:%>ла K  ;
!: K ;
